New Jersey, session 221, S2020.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1998, c.97 (C.17:48-6t) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  Except as otherwise provided in P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-2 et seq.) and P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-17 et seq.), no group or individual hospital service corporation contract providing hospital or medical expense benefits shall: (1)   contain any provision [which denies] denying benefits for expenses incurred in the treatment of an injury or injuries sustained by the subscriber or other person covered thereunder as the result of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19)[, to a subscriber or other person covered thereunder].  Benefits for these expenses shall be provided to the same extent as for any other treatment under the contract; or (2)   contain any provision denying benefits for expenses incurred in the provision of mental health treatment or therapy to a subscriber or other person covered thereunder who is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  Mental health treatment and therapy provided to a victim of domestic violence shall be deemed to be medically necessary, and benefits for these expenses shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medically necessary treatment under the contract. b.    The provisions of this section shall apply to all contracts in which the hospital service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. (cf: P.L.1998, c.97, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.1998, c.97 (C.17:48A-7s) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  Except as otherwise provided in P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-2 et seq.) and P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-17 et seq.), no group or individual medical service corporation contract providing hospital or medical expense benefits shall: (1)   contain any provision [which denies] denying benefits for expenses incurred in the treatment of an injury or injuries sustained by the subscriber or other person covered thereunder as the result of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19)[, to a subscriber or other person covered thereunder].  Benefits for these expenses shall be provided to the same extent as for any other treatment under the contract; or (2)   contain any provision denying benefits for expenses incurred in the provision of mental health treatment or therapy to a subscriber or other person covered thereunder who is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  Mental health treatment and therapy provided to a victim of domestic violence shall be deemed to be medically necessary, and benefits for these expenses shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medically necessary treatment under the contract. b.    The provisions of this section shall apply to all contracts in which the medical service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. (cf: P.L.1998, c.97, s.2) 3.    Section 3 of P.L.1998, c.97 (C.17:48E-35.18) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  Except as otherwise provided in P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-2 et seq.) and P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-17 et seq.), no group or individual health service corporation contract providing hospital or medical expense benefits shall: (1)   contain any provision [which denies] denying benefits for expenses incurred in the treatment of an injury or injuries sustained by the subscriber or other person covered thereunder as the result of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19)[, to a subscriber or other person covered thereunder].  Benefits for these expenses shall be provided to the same extent as for any other treatment under the contract; or (2)   contain any provision denying benefits for expenses incurred in the provision of mental health treatment or therapy to a subscriber or other person covered thereunder who is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  Mental health treatment and therapy provided to a victim of domestic violence shall be deemed to be medically necessary, and benefits for these expenses shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medically necessary treatment under the contract. b.    The provisions of this section shall apply to all contracts in which the health service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. (cf: P.L.1998, c.97, s.3) 4.    Section 4 of P.L.1998, c.97 (C.17B:26-2.1q) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  Except as otherwise provided in P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-2 et seq.), no individual health insurance policy providing hospital or medical expense benefits shall: (1)   contain any provision [which denies] denying benefits for expenses incurred in the treatment of an injury or injuries sustained by the named insured or other person covered thereunder as the result of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19)[, to a named insured or other person covered thereunder].  Benefits for these expenses shall be provided to the same extent as for any other treatment under the policy; or (2)   contain any provision denying benefits for expenses incurred in the provision of mental health treatment or therapy to the named insured or other person covered thereunder who is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  Mental health treatment and therapy provided to a victim of domestic violence shall be deemed to be medically necessary, and benefits for these expenses shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medically necessary treatment under the policy. b.    The provisions of this section shall apply to all policies in which the insurer has reserved the right to change the premium. (cf: P.L.1998, c.97, s.4) 5.    Section 5 of P.L.1998, c.97 (C.17B:27-46.1t) is amended to read as follows: 5.    a.  Except as otherwise provided in P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-17 et seq.), no group health insurance policy providing hospital or medical expense benefits shall: (1)   contain any provision [which denies] denying benefits for expenses incurred in the treatment of an injury or injuries sustained by the named insured or other person covered thereunder as the result of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19)[, to a named insured or other person covered thereunder].  Benefits for these expenses shall be provided to the same extent as for any other treatment under the policy; or (2)   contain any provision denying benefits for expenses incurred in the provision of mental health treatment or therapy to the named insured or other person covered thereunder who is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  Mental health treatment and therapy provided to a victim of domestic violence shall be deemed to be medically necessary, and benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medically necessary treatment under the policy. b.    The provisions of this section shall apply to all policies in which the insurer has reserved the right to change the premium. (cf: P.L.1998, c.97, s.5) 6.    Section 6 of P.L.1998, c.97 (C.26:2J-4.18) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a.  Except as otherwise provided in P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-2 et seq.) and P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-17 et seq.), no health maintenance organization shall: (1)   deny health care services for the treatment of an injury or injuries sustained by an enrollee as the result of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19)[, to its enrollees.  Services]. Such services shall be provided to the same extent as for any other treatment; or (2)   deny health care services for the mental health treatment or therapy of an enrollee who is the victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  Mental health treatment and therapy provided to a victim of domestic violence shall be deemed to be medically necessary, and health care services associated with such treatment and therapy shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medically necessary treatment. b.    The provisions of this section shall apply to all certificates of authority in which the health maintenance organization has reserved the right to change the schedule of charges for enrollee coverage. (cf: P.L.1998, c.97, s.6) 7.    (New section)  a.  Every individual health benefits plan that is delivered, issued, executed, or renewed in this State, or is approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of P.L. , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall provide coverage for expenses incurred in the provision of mental health treatment or therapy to a person covered thereunder who is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  Mental health treatment and therapy provided to a victim of domestic violence shall be deemed to be medically necessary, and benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medically necessary treatment under the plan. b.    This section shall apply to all health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. 8.    (New section)  a.  Every small employer health benefits plan that is delivered, issued, executed, or renewed in this State, or is approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall provide coverage for expenses incurred in the provision of mental health treatment or therapy to a person covered thereunder who is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  Mental health treatment and therapy provided to a victim of domestic violence shall be deemed to be medically necessary, and benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medically necessary treatment under the plan. b.    This section shall apply to all health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. 9.    (New section)  The State Health Benefits Commission shall ensure that every contract providing hospital or medical expense benefits, which is purchased by the commission on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), provides coverage for expenses incurred in the provision of mental health treatment or therapy to a person covered thereunder who is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  Mental health treatment and therapy provided to a victim of domestic violence shall be deemed to be medically necessary, and benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medically necessary treatment under the contract. 10.  (New section)  The School Employees Health Benefits Commission shall ensure that every contract providing hospital or medical expense benefits, which is purchased by the commission on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), provides coverage for expenses incurred in the provision of mental health treatment or therapy to a person covered thereunder who is a victim of domestic violence, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-19).  Mental health treatment and therapy provided to a victim of domestic violence shall be deemed to be medically necessary, and benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medically necessary treatment under the contract. 11.  This act shall take effect immediately.